Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1651
Private postsecondary career school; subject to jurisdiction of courts of this state.

Any private postsecondary career school not exempt under section 85-1604, whether or not a resident of or having a place of business in this state, which instructs or educates or offers to contract to provide instructional or educational services in this state to a resident of this state, whether such instruction or services are provided in person or by correspondence, or which offers to award or awards any educational credentials to a resident of this state, thereby submits such school and, if a natural person, his or her personal representative to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state concerning any cause of action arising therefrom and for the purpose of enforcement of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act by injunction pursuant to sections 85-1652 and 85-1653.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 56;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 93;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 50;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2856;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 51.